Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 18. Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995.

§ 33.2-1800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affected locality or public entity”
means any county, city, or town in which all or a portion of a qualifying transportation facility is located and any other responsible public entity directly affected by the qualifying transportation facility.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission.

“Comprehensive agreement”
means the comprehensive agreement between the private entity and the responsible public entity required by §

33.2-1808

.

“Concession”
means any lease, license, franchise, easement, or other binding agreement transferring rights for the use or control, in whole or in part, of a qualifying transportation facility by a responsible public entity to a private entity for a definite term during which the private entity will provide transportation-related services, including operations and maintenance, revenue collection, toll-collection enforcement, design, construction, and other activities that enhance throughput, reduce congestion, or otherwise manage the facility, in return for the right to receive all or a portion of the revenues of the qualifying transportation facility.

“Concession payment”
means a payment from a private entity to a responsible public entity in connection with the development and/or operation of a qualifying transportation facility pursuant to a concession.

“Develop”
or

“development”

means to plan, design, develop, finance, lease, acquire, install, construct, or expand.

“Interim agreement”
means an agreement, including a memorandum of understanding or binding preliminary agreement, between the private entity and the responsible public entity that provides for completion of studies and any other activities to advance the development and/or operation of a qualifying transportation facility.

“Material default”
means any default by the private entity in the performance of its duties under subsection E of §

33.2-1807

that jeopardizes adequate service to the public from a qualifying transportation facility and remains unremedied after the responsible public entity has provided notice to the private entity and a reasonable cure period has elapsed.

“Multimodal transportation facility”
means a transportation facility consisting of multiple modes of transportation.

“Operate”
or

“operation”

means to finance, maintain, improve, equip, modify, repair, or operate.

“Private entity”
means any natural person, corporation, general partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, joint venture, business trust, public benefit corporation, nonprofit entity, or other business entity.

“Public entity”
means the Commonwealth and any agency or authority thereof; any county, city, or town; and any other political subdivision of any of the foregoing, but does not include any public service company.

“Qualifying transportation facility”
means one or more transportation facilities developed and/or operated by a private entity pursuant to this chapter.

“Responsible public entity”
means a public entity, including local governments and regional authorities, that has the power to develop and/or operate the qualifying transportation facility.

“Revenues”
means all revenues, including income; earnings; user fees; lease payments; allocations; federal, state, regional, and local appropriations or the appropriations or other funds available to any political subdivision, authority, or instrumentality thereof; bond proceeds; equity investments, service payments, or any combination thereof arising out of or in connection with supporting the development and/or operation of a qualifying transportation facility, including money received as grants or otherwise from the United States of America, from any public entity, or from any agency or instrumentality of the foregoing in aid of such facility.

“Service contract”
means a contract entered into between a public entity and the private entity pursuant to §

33.2-1804

.

“Service payments”
means payments to the private entity in connection with the development and/or operation of a qualifying transportation facility pursuant to a service contract.

“State”
means the Commonwealth of Virginia.

“Transportation facility”
means any road, bridge, tunnel, overpass, ferry, airport, mass transit facility, vehicle parking facility, port facility, or similar commercial facility used for the transportation of persons or goods, together with any buildings, structures, parking areas, appurtenances, and other property needed to operate such facility; however, “transportation facility” does not include a commercial or retail use or enterprise not essential to the transportation of persons or goods.

“User fees”
mean the rates, tolls, fees, or other charges imposed by the private entity for use of all or a portion of a qualifying transportation facility pursuant to the interim or comprehensive agreement.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-557; 1995, c. 647; 2001, c. 286; 2002, cc. 570, 593; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2006, c. 922; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to authority of public entity or affected local jurisdiction to conduct closed meetings for certain limited purposes, see §

2.2-3711

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 684, cl. 10 provides: “That prior to January 1, 2018, the Department of Rail and Public Transportation is authorized to enter into an agreement with a private entity pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) to improve passenger rail service within the Commonwealth wherein the private entity finances the improvements in return for annual payments from funds allocated by the Commonwealth Transportation Board pursuant to §§

33.2-1601

and

33.2-1603

of the Code of Virginia for a period not to exceed 20 years, provided that such annual payments shall be apportioned by the Commonwealth Transportation Board between the Intercity Passenger Rail Operating and Capital Fund and the Rail Enhancement Fund on the basis of the annual revenues of and proportional benefit incurred to each fund.”

§ 33.2-1801.
Policy.

The General Assembly finds that:

There is a public need for timely development and/or operation of transportation facilities within the Commonwealth that address the needs identified by the appropriate state, regional, or local transportation plan by improving safety, reducing congestion, increasing capacity, enhancing economic efficiency, or any combination thereof and that such public need may not be wholly satisfied by existing methods of procurement in which qualifying transportation facilities are developed and/or operated;

Such public need may not be wholly satisfied by existing ways in which transportation facilities are developed and/or operated; and

Authorizing private entities to develop and/or operate one or more transportation facilities may result in the development and/or operation of such transportation facilities to the public in a more timely, more efficient, or less costly fashion, thereby serving the public safety and welfare.

A public-private partnership may be in the best interest of the public only if the requirements of subdivisions C 1 through 5 of §

33.2-1803

have been met.

It is the intent of this chapter, among other things, to encourage investment in the Commonwealth by private entities that facilitates the development and/or operation of transportation facilities when such investment is in the best interest of the public. Accordingly, public and private entities may have the greatest possible flexibility in contracting with each other for the provision of the public services that are the subject of this chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with the purposes hereof.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-558; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2006, c. 922; 2014, c. 805; 2017, cc. 539, 551.

Cross references.

As to the Toll Facilities Revolving Account, see §

33.2-1529

.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 539 and 551 are identical, and rewrote subsection B which formerly read: “An action, other than the approval of the responsible public entity under §

33.2-1803

, shall serve the public purpose of this chapter if such action, including undertaking a concession, facilitates the timely development and/or operation of a qualifying transportation facility”; and in subsection C, inserted “when such investment is in the best interest of the public.”

§ 33.2-1802.
Prerequisite for operation.

Any private entity seeking authorization under this chapter to develop and/or operate a transportation facility shall first obtain approval of the responsible public entity under §

33.2-1803

. Such private entity may initiate the approval process by requesting approval pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-1803

or the responsible public entity may request proposals pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-1803

.

Any responsible public entity that is an agency or institution of the Commonwealth receiving a detailed proposal from a private entity for a qualifying transportation facility that is a port facility as defined in §

62.1-140

shall provide notice of the receipt of such proposal to the Public-Private Partnership Advisory Commission established in § 30-279.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-559; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2011, c. 589; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1803.
Approval by the responsible public entity.

The private entity may request approval by the responsible public entity. Any such request shall be accompanied by the following material and information unless waived by the responsible public entity in its guidelines or other instructions given, in writing, to the private entity with respect to the transportation facility or facilities that the private entity proposes to develop and/or operate as a qualifying transportation facility:

A topographic map (1:2,000 or other appropriate scale) indicating the location of the transportation facility or facilities;

A description of the transportation facility or facilities, including the conceptual design of such facility or facilities and all proposed interconnections with other transportation facilities;

The proposed date for development and/or operation of the transportation facility or facilities along with an estimate of the life-cycle cost of the transportation facility as proposed;

A statement setting forth the method by which the private entity proposes to secure any property interests required for the transportation facility or facilities;

Information relating to the current transportation plans, if any, of each affected locality or public entity;

A list of all permits and approvals required for developing and/or operating improvements to the transportation facility or facilities from local, state, or federal agencies and a projected schedule for obtaining such permits and approvals;

A list of public utility’s, locality’s, or political subdivision’s facilities, if any, that will be crossed by the transportation facility or facilities and a statement of the plans of the private entity to accommodate such crossings;

A statement setting forth the private entity’s general plans for developing and/or operating the transportation facility or facilities, including identification of any revenue, public or private, or proposed debt or equity investment or concession proposed by the private entity;

The names and addresses of the persons who may be contacted for further information concerning the request;

Information on how the private entity’s proposal will address the needs identified in the appropriate state, regional, or local transportation plan by improving safety, reducing congestion, increasing capacity, enhancing economic efficiency, or any combination thereof;

A statement of the risks, liabilities, and responsibilities to be transferred, assigned, or assumed by the private entity for the development and/or operation of the transportation facility, including revenue risk and operations and maintenance; and

Such additional material and information as the responsible public entity may reasonably request pursuant to its guidelines or other written instructions.

The responsible public entity may request proposals from private entities for the development and/or operation of transportation facilities subject to the following:

For transportation facilities where the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation is the responsible public entity, the Transportation Public-Private Partnership Steering Committee established pursuant to §

33.2-1803.2

has determined that moving forward with the development and/or operation of the facility pursuant to this article serves the best interest of the public.

A finding of public interest pursuant to §

33.2-1803.1

has been issued by the responsible public entity.

The responsible public entity shall not charge a fee to cover the costs of processing, reviewing, and evaluating proposals received in response to such requests.

The responsible public entity may grant approval of the development and/or operation of the transportation facility or facilities as a qualifying transportation facility if the responsible public entity determines that it is in the best interest of the public. The responsible public entity may determine that the development and/or operation of the transportation facility or facilities as a qualifying transportation facility serves the best interest of the public if:

The private entity can develop and/or operate the transportation facility or facilities with a public contribution amount that is less than the maximum public contribution determined pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-1803.1:1

for transportation facilities where the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation is the responsible public entity;

There is a public need for the transportation facility or facilities the private entity proposes to develop and/or operate as a qualifying transportation facility and for transportation facilities where the Department of Transportation or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation is the responsible public entity, such facility or facilities meet a need included in the plan developed pursuant to §

33.2-353

;

The plan for the development and/or operation of the transportation facility or facilities is anticipated to have significant benefits as determined pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

33.2-1803.1

;

The private entity’s plans will result in the timely development and/or operation of the transportation facility or facilities or their more efficient operation; and

The risks, liabilities, and responsibilities transferred, assigned, or assumed by the private entity provide sufficient benefits to the public to not proceed with the development and/or operation of the transportation facility through other means of procurement available to the responsible public entity.In evaluating any request, the responsible public entity may rely upon internal staff reports prepared by personnel familiar with the operation of similar facilities or the advice of outside advisors or consultants having relevant experience.

The responsible public entity shall not enter into a comprehensive agreement unless the chief executive officer of the responsible public entity certifies in writing to the Governor and the General Assembly that:

The finding of public interest issued pursuant to §

33.2-1803.1

is still valid;

The transfer, assignment, and assumption of risks, liabilities, and permitting responsibilities and the mitigation of revenue risk by the private sector have not materially changed since the finding of public interest was issued pursuant to §

33.2-1803.1

; and

The public contribution requested by the private entity does not exceed the maximum public contribution determined pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-1803.1:1

.Changes to the project scope that do not impact the assignment of risks or liabilities or the mitigation of revenue risk shall not be considered material changes to the finding of public interest, provided that such changes were presented in a public meeting to the Commonwealth Transportation Board, other state board, or the governing body of a locality, as appropriate.

The responsible public entity may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs of processing, reviewing, and evaluating the request submitted by a private entity pursuant to subsection A, including reasonable attorney fees and fees for financial and other necessary advisors or consultants. The responsible public entity shall also develop guidelines that establish the process for the acceptance and review of a proposal from a private entity pursuant to subsections A, B, C, and D. Such guidelines shall establish a specific schedule for review of the proposal by the responsible public entity, a process for alteration of that schedule by the responsible public entity if it deems that changes are necessary because of the scope or complexity of proposals it receives, the process for receipt and review of competing proposals, and the type and amount of information that is necessary for adequate review of proposals in each stage of review. For qualifying transportation facilities that have approved or pending state and federal environmental clearances, have secured significant right-of-way, have previously allocated significant state or federal funding, or exhibit other circumstances that could reasonably reduce the amount of time to develop and/or operate the qualifying transportation facility in accordance with the purpose of this chapter, the guidelines shall provide for a prioritized documentation, review, and selection process.

The approval of the responsible public entity shall be subject to the private entity’s entering into an interim agreement or a comprehensive agreement with the responsible public entity. For any project with an estimated construction cost of over $50 million, the responsible public entity also shall require the private entity to pay the costs for an independent audit of any and all traffic and cost estimates associated with the private entity’s proposal, as well as a review of all public costs and potential liabilities to which taxpayers could be exposed (including improvements to other transportation facilities that may be needed as a result of the proposal, failure by the private entity to reimburse the responsible public entity for services provided, and potential risk and liability in the event the private entity defaults on the comprehensive agreement or on bonds issued for the project). This independent audit shall be conducted by an independent consultant selected by the responsible public entity, and all such information from such review shall be fully disclosed.

In connection with its approval of the development and/or operation of the transportation facility or facilities as a qualifying transportation facility, the responsible public entity shall establish a date for the acquisition of or the beginning of construction of or improvements to the qualifying transportation facility. The responsible public entity may extend such date.

The responsible public entity shall take appropriate action, as more specifically set forth in its guidelines, to protect confidential and proprietary information provided by the private entity pursuant to an agreement under subdivision 11 of §

2.2-3705.6

.

The responsible public entity may also apply for, execute, and/or endorse applications submitted by private entities to obtain federal credit assistance for qualifying projects developed and/or operated pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-560; 1995, c. 647; 2003, c. 289; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2006, c. 922; 2008, c. 296; 2014, cc. 474, 805; 2015, c. 612; 2017, cc. 539, 551; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 474 amended former § 56-560, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendment by c. 474 has been given effect in this section by substituting “A list of public utility’s, locality’s, or political subdivision’s facilities” for “A list of public utility facilities” in subdivision A 7.

Acts 2015, c. 612, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Transportation, by September 1, 2015, shall develop a risk assessment model to identify the relative risks associated with a proposed transportation project and facilitate the identification of high-risk projects in advance of project procurement. Further, the Department of Transportation shall establish procurement processes and guidelines for identified high-risk projects to ensure the protection of the public interest.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 612 added subdivisions A 11, B 1, B 2, and subsection D and redesignated remaining subdivisions and subsections accordingly; inserted the subdivisions designation and first paragraph of subdivision C 5.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 539 and 551 are identical, and in subdivision B 1, substituted “Steering Committee” for “Advisory Committee” and substituted “best interest of the public” for “public interest”; in subsection C, substituted “is in the best interest of the public” for “serves the public purpose of this chapter” in the first sentence, and substituted “the best interest of the public” for “such public purpose”; rewrote subdivisions C 1 through C 3; in subsection D, rewrote the former first sentence adding the subdivision D 1 through D 3 designations; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, inserted “the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority” following “Department of Transportation” in subsections B 1 and C 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Responsible public entity.” —

The Virginia Port Authority, pursuant to § 56-557, is the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 for any concession of Port facilities because the General Assembly has conferred on it alone the power to develop and/or operate Port facilities and, as a result, the Virginia Port Authority bears statutory responsibility to review and evaluate the proposals received by private entities for the concession of Port facilities, and to do so according to any guidelines adopted by it pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012) (decided under prior law).

The Virginia Port Authority, as the responsible public entity under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995, has the authority pursuant to §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1 to determine whether or not to select a preferred proposer with which to enter into negotiations for a comprehensive agreement for the concession to operate Port facilities. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012) (decided under prior law).

The selection of the preferred proposer remains in the discretion of the Virginia Port Authority as the responsible public entity, but the Virginia Port Authority may not sign a comprehensive agreement without first receiving the approval of the Secretary of Transportation as required by subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012) (decided under prior law).

Under the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995, specifically §§ 56-560 and 56-573.1, the Virginia Port Authority, as the responsible public entity, has the authority to (i) approve entering into a comprehensive agreement, and (ii) subject to final approval by the Secretary of Transportation pursuant to subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1, execute a comprehensive agreement on behalf of the Commonwealth for the concession to operate Port facilities. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012) (decided under prior law).

The role of Governor. —

The Governor, having supervisory authority over the Secretary of Transportation under subsection B of §

2.2-200

, may provide appropriate coordination and guidance as the Secretary of Transportation exercises his authority under subdivision 2 of § 56-573.1 to determine whether to give final approval before the responsible public entity signs a comprehensive agreement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Frank W. Wagner, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Barry D. Knight, Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia; The Honorable Christopher P. Stolle, M.D., Member, House of Delegates; The Honorable Ralph S. Northam, M.D., Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-078, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 37 (10/3/2012) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-1803.1.
Finding of public interest.

Prior to the meeting of the Committee pursuant to subsection C of §

33.2-1803.2

, the chief executive officer of the responsible public entity shall make a finding of public interest. Such finding shall include information set forth in subsection B. For transportation facilities where the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation is the responsible public entity, the Secretary of Transportation, in his role as chairman of the Board, must concur with the finding of public interest.

At a minimum, a finding of public interest shall contain the following information:

A description of the benefits expected to be realized by the responsible public entity through the development and/or operation of the transportation facility, including person throughput, congestion mitigation, safety, economic development, environmental quality, and land use.

An analysis of the public contribution necessary for the development and/or operation of the facility or facilities pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-1803.1:1

, including a maximum public contribution that will be allowed under the procurement.

A description of the benefits expected to be realized by the responsible public entity through the use of this chapter compared with the development and/or operation of the transportation facility through other options available to the responsible public entity.

A statement of the risks, liabilities, and responsibilities to be transferred, assigned, or assumed by the private entity, which shall include the following:

A discussion of whether revenue risk will be transferred to the private entity and the degree to which any such transfer may be mitigated through other provisions in the interim or comprehensive agreements;

A description of the risks, liabilities, and responsibilities to be retained by the responsible public entity; and

Other items determined appropriate by the responsible public entity in the guidelines for this chapter.

The determination of whether the project has a high, medium, or low level of project delivery risk and a description of how such determination was made. If the qualifying transportation facility is determined to contain high risk, a description of how the public’s interest will be protected through the transfer, assignment, or assumption of risks or responsibilities by the private entity in the event that issues arise with the development and/or operation of the qualifying transportation facility.

If the responsible public entity proposes to enter into an interim or comprehensive agreement pursuant to subdivision 2 of §

33.2-1819

, information and the rationale demonstrating that proceeding in this manner is more beneficial than proceeding pursuant to subdivision 1 of §

33.2-1819

.

History.

2015, c. 612; 2017, cc. 539, 551; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 612, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Transportation, by September 1, 2015, shall develop a risk assessment model to identify the relative risks associated with a proposed transportation project and facilitate the identification of high-risk projects in advance of project procurement. Further, the Department of Transportation shall establish procurement processes and guidelines for identified high-risk projects to ensure the protection of the public interest.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 539 and 551 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “meeting of the Committee pursuant to subsection C of §

33.2-1803

.2” for “initiation of a procurement pursuant to §

33.2-1803

” and added the last sentence; inserted subdivisions B 1 and 2, and redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and inserted “the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority” following “Department of Transportation” in subsection A.

§ 33.2-1803.1:1.
Public sector analysis and competition.

For any transportation facility under consideration for development and/or operation under this chapter by the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, the responsible public entity shall ensure competition throughout the procurement process by developing a public sector option based on the analysis conducted in subsection B. The public sector option shall identify a maximum public contribution.

The responsible public entity shall undertake, in cooperation with the Secretary of Transportation and the Secretary of Finance, a public sector analysis of the cost for the responsible entity to develop and/or operate the transportation facility or facilities being considered for development and/or operation pursuant to this chapter. At a minimum, such analysis shall contain the following information:

Any mitigation of risk of user-fee financing through assumptions related to competing facilities, compensation for high usage of the facility by high-occupancy vehicles, or other considerations that may mitigate the risk of user-fee financing.

Whether the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation intends to maintain and operate the facility, or if the public sector option is based on the transfer of such responsibilities to the private sector.

Public contribution, if any, that would still be required to cover all costs necessary for the development and/or operation of the transportation facility in excess of financing available should the General Assembly authorize the use of debt secured by a pledge of net revenues derived from rates, fees, or other charges and the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth pursuant to Article X, Section 9 (c) of the Constitution of Virginia.

Funds provided to support nonuser fee generating components of the project that contribute to the benefits expected to be realized from the transportation facility pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

33.2-1803.1

.

History.

2017, cc. 539, 551; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, inserted “the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority” following “Department of Transportation” in subsection A; inserted “the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority” following “Department of Transportation” in subdivision B 2.

§ 33.2-1803.2.
Transportation Public-Private Partnership Steering Committee.

There is hereby established the Transportation Public-Private Partnership Steering Committee (the Committee) to evaluate and review financing options for the development and/or operation of transportation facility or facilities.The Committee shall consist of the following members:

Two members of the Commonwealth Transportation Board;

The staff director of the House Committee on Appropriations, or his designee, and the staff director of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, or his designee;

A Deputy Secretary of Transportation who shall serve as the chairman;

The chief financial officer of either the Department of Transportation or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, as appropriate; and

A nonagency public financial expert, as selected by the Secretary of Transportation.

Prior to the initiation of any procurement pursuant to §

33.2-1803

by the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, the Committee shall meet to review the public sector analysis and competition developed pursuant to §

33.2-1803.1:1

and concur that:

The assumptions regarding the project scope, benefits, and costs of the public sector option developed pursuant to §

33.2-1803.1:1

were fully and reasonably developed;

The assumed financing costs and valuation of both financial and construction risk mitigation included in the public sector option are financially sound and reflect the best interest of the public; and

The terms sheet developed for the proposed procurement contains all necessary elements.

After receipt of responses to the request for qualifications, but prior to the issuance of the first draft request for proposals, the Committee shall meet to determine that the development and/or operation of the transportation facility or facilities as a qualifying transportation facility serves the public interest pursuant to §

33.2-1803.1

. If the Committee makes an affirmative determination, as evidenced by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the Committee, the Department of Transportation or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation may proceed with the procurement pursuant to §

33.2-1803

.

Meetings of the Committee shall be open to the public, and meetings will be scheduled on an as-needed basis. However, the Committee may convene a closed session pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions A 6 and 29 of §

2.2-3711

to allow the Committee to review the public sector analysis and competition and to review proposals received pursuant to a request for qualifications.

The Committee shall, within 10 business days of any meeting, report on the findings of such meeting. Such report shall be made to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations.

Within 60 days of the execution of a comprehensive agreement pursuant to §

33.2-1803

, the Department of Transportation or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, as appropriate, shall, in closed session, brief the Committee on the details of the final bids received and the details of the evaluation of such bids.

History.

2015, c. 612; 2017, cc. 539, 551; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 612, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Transportation, by September 1, 2015, shall develop a risk assessment model to identify the relative risks associated with a proposed transportation project and facilitate the identification of high-risk projects in advance of project procurement. Further, the Department of Transportation shall establish procurement processes and guidelines for identified high-risk projects to ensure the protection of the public interest.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance.” March 10, 2021.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 539 and 551 are identical, and rewrote former subsections A and B as subsection A; inserted subsections B and C; redesignated and rewrote former subsections C and D as subsections D and E; and added subsection F.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and inserted “the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority” in subsection B.

§ 33.2-1804.
Service contracts.

In addition to any authority otherwise conferred by law, any public entity may contract with a private entity for transportation services to be provided by a qualifying transportation facility in exchange for such service payments and other consideration as such public entity may deem appropriate.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-561; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1805.
Affected localities or public entities.

Any private entity requesting approval from, or submitting a proposal to, a responsible public entity under §

33.2-1803

shall notify each affected locality or public entity by furnishing a copy of its request or proposal to each affected locality or public entity.

Each affected locality or public entity that is not a responsible public entity for the respective qualifying transportation facility shall, within 60 days after receiving a request for comments from the responsible public entity, submit in writing any comments it may have on the proposed qualifying transportation facility to the responsible public entity and indicate whether the facility will address the needs identified in the appropriate state, regional, or local transportation plan by improving safety, reducing congestion, increasing capacity, enhancing economic efficiency, or any combination thereof.

Any qualifying transportation facility, title or easement to which is held by the Commonwealth or an agency or authority therefor and the rights to develop or operate which have been granted to the private entity through a concession as defined in §

33.2-1800

, shall be subject to the provisions of Title 15.2 in the same manner as a facility of the Commonwealth, mutatis mutandis, except that such private entity shall comply with the provisions of subsections B and C of §

15.2-2202

as they relate to the affected locality’s or public entity’s comprehensive plan.

History.

1994, c. 855, § 56-563; 1995, c. 647; 2005, cc. 504, 562; 2006, c. 922; 2014, c. 805.